South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3187.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 7, Title 40 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 40-7-40. No person may use or display a barber pole for the purposes of advertising the practice of barbering unless he is licensed in accordance with this chapter. SECTION 2.  Section 40-7-20 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (3) "Barber pole" means a cylinder or pole with alternating stripes of any combination including, but not limited to, red and white, or red, white, and blue, which run diagonally along the length of pole. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----